src/mrj-lex.txt
LEXICON alo-Spat-PoN
 alo-Spat-1Arg ;
 kal-N ;
+N+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;

LEXICON kovolo-Spat
+Interr+Spat+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Interr+Spat+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Interr+Spat+Loc+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Interr+Spat+Prl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Interr+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Interr+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Interr+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;

+Rel+Spat+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Rel+Spat+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Rel+Spat+Loc+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Rel+Spat+Prl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Rel+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Rel+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Rel+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;



LEXICON Mezty
+Assoc+Pl+Nom:%>мезть Clitic ;
+Assoc+Dat:%>мезнень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Gen:%>мезень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abl:%>мезде Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abe:%>мезевтеме Clitic ;
!+Assoc:%>мезть Clitic


 
LEXICON osh-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 osh--DefSg- ;
 osh-Indef--Poss ;

LEXICON osh--DefSg-
+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-Indef--Poss
+Indef: osh-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 kudo--DefSg- ;
 kudo-Indef--Poss ;

LEXICON kudo--DefSg-
+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef--Poss
+Indef: kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-Obl ;




! TODO: Integrate this in xml-files in working…

!LEXICON SUBSTANDARDS 
!коръя+Use/Sub:корья Noun1 ;

!! +WORK Shows up then the following LEXICA are used.

LEXICON V-ledems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-ledems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-kadoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-kadoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nevtems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-nevtems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-savtoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-savtoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-kundams_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-kundams_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nekshnems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-nekshnems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nekshnems-WORK
+WORK: V-nekshnems ;

LEXICON V-satoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-satoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-ledems-WORK
+WORK: V-ledems ;

LEXICON V-satoms-WORK
+WORK: V-satoms ;

LEXICON V-letems-WORK
+WORK: V-letems ;

LEXICON V-kadoms-WORK
+WORK: V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-jangavoms-WORK
+WORK: V-jangavoms ;

LEXICON V-sajevems-WORK
+WORK: V-sajevems ;

LEXICON V-nevtems-WORK
+WORK: V-nevtems ;

LEXICON V-savtoms-WORK
+WORK: V-savtoms ;

LEXICON V-kundams-WORK
+WORK: V-kundams ;

LEXICON V-tejems-WORK
+WORK: V-tejems ;

LEXICON vitj-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-vitj ;

LEXICON erek-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-erek ;

LEXICON od-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-od ;

LEXICON vanjks-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-vanjks ;

LEXICON nachko-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-nachko ;

LEXICON lembe-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-lembe ;

LEXICON shumbra-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-shumbra ;

LEXICON kal-N-WORK
+WORK: kal-N ;

LEXICON kit-N-WORK
+WORK: kit-N ;

LEXICON lak-N-WORK
+WORK: lak-N ;

LEXICON osh-N-WORK
+WORK: osh-N ;

LEXICON pango-N-WORK
+WORK: pango-N ;

LEXICON tinge-N-WORK
+WORK: tinge-N ;

LEXICON teshte-N-WORK
+WORK: teshte-N ;

LEXICON kudo-N-WORK
+WORK: kudo-N ;
